Hawaii statutes.
§171-14 Auction. Except as otherwise
specifically provided, all disposition of public lands shall be made at public
auction after public notice as provided in section 171-16. All such auctions
shall be held at the door of the office of the land agent or at such other
place as is convenient in the district in which the land is located, and shall
be conducted by the chairperson or the land agent or by any other authorized
employee of the department of land and natural resources under the direction of
the board of land and natural resources, all of whom shall perform this service
without extra compensation. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; am L 1963, c 28, §1; am L
1965, c 239, §3; Supp, §103A-14; HRS §171-14; gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next